Wyoming, session 2025, HB0190.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-21-103 is amended to read:

22-21-103. How bond question to be submitted to
electors; contents; approval.

Each bond question shall be submitted to a vote of the
qualified electors of the political subdivision. Every bond
election shall be held on the same day as a primary
election or a general election, or on the Tuesday next
HB0190

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0629
following the first Monday in May or November, or on the
Tuesday next following the third Monday in August. Not less
than one hundred thirty (130) days before a bond election
and before submitting the bond question to the county clerk
under this section, the political subdivision shall submit
the proposed bond question to the secretary of state for
approval. Not less than one hundred twenty (120) days
before a bond election, the secretary of state shall
approve the form of the bond question if it complies with
this section, modify the language or form to conform with
this section if necessary and notify the political
subdivision of the approval or modifications of the bond
question. Not less than one hundred ten (110) days before a
bond election, the political subdivision shall provide
written notification to the county clerk specifying the
date of the election and the bond question. The bond
question shall state the purpose of the bonds in a true and
impartial manner, the maximum principal amount thereof, the
maximum number of years allowed for the indebtedness and
the maximum rate of interest to be paid thereon. The
secretary of state may promulgate reasonable rules for
conducting bond elections where the election is not held at
the same time as the general or primary election.
HB0190

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0629

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0190